Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
INSPECTION SERVICE, WITHDRAWAL AND COMPENSATION

§159-46 Inspection; overtime compensation.
All animals slaughtered by any slaughterhouse duly licensed under this part
shall be inspected by an inspector duly authorized by the department, both before
and after slaughtering, and no animal shall be slaughtered, or after slaughter
be sold, transported, offered for sale or transportation, or received for
transportation in commerce unless the slaughtering thereof or the use thereof
in commerce, after slaughtering, is approved by an inspector.

The management of any processing establishment,
slaughterhouse, or the owner of any animal to be slaughtered requiring the
services of an inspector in excess of eight consecutive hours on any workday,
or in excess of forty hours in any workweek, or on legal holidays, shall pay to
the department for overtime inspection services, the current state overtime
rate for each hour of work performed by the inspector.

The department shall pay the inspector for all
overtime inspection services performed; provided that the party requesting or
requiring the overtime inspection services shall sufficiently in advance of the
overtime period arrange with the department for the services. [L 1969, c 214,
pt of §1; am L 1990, c 139, §11; am L 1991, c 88, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next